Hawaii statutes.
§23-52 Assessment report; contents.
The report required under section 23-51 for assessing the impact of a proposed
mandate of health coverage shall include at the minimum and to the extent that
information is available, the following:

(1) The social impact.

(A) The extent to which the treatment or
service is generally utilized by a significant portion of the population;

(B) The extent to which such insurance
coverage is already generally available;

(C) If coverage is not generally available,
the extent to which the lack of coverage results in persons being unable to
obtain necessary health care treatment;

(D) If the coverage is not generally
available, the extent to which the lack of coverage results in unreasonable
financial hardship on those persons needing treatment;

(E) The level of public demand for the
treatment or service;

(F) The level of public demand for individual
or group insurance coverage of the treatment or service;

(G) The level of interest of collective
bargaining organizations in negotiating privately for inclusion of this
coverage in group contracts;

(H) The impact of providing coverage for the
treatment or service (such as morbidity, mortality, quality of care, change in
practice patterns, provider competition, or related items); and

(I) The impact of any other indirect costs
upon the costs and benefits of coverage as may be directed by the legislature
or deemed necessary by the auditor in order to carry out the intent of this
section.

(2) The financial impact.

(A) The extent to which insurance coverage of
the kind proposed would increase or decrease the cost of the treatment or
service;

(B) The extent to which the proposed coverage
might increase the use of the treatment or service;

(C) The extent to which the mandated
treatment or service might serve as an alternative for more expensive treatment
or service;

(D) The extent to which insurance coverage of
the health care service or provider can be reasonably expected to increase or
decrease the insurance premium and administrative expenses of policyholders;
and

(E) The impact of this coverage on the total
cost of health care. [L 1987, c 331, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 227, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next